test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-oomas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - oomâs: # 2B
    oomâs+N+Sg+Nom: oomâs
    oomâs+N+Sg+Gen: oommâs
    oomâs+N+Sg+Acc: oommâs
    oomâs+N+Sg+Ill: ommâsân
    oomâs+N+Sg+Loc: ommâsist
    oomâs+N+Sg+Com: ommâsáin
    oomâs+N+Sg+Abe: oommâsttáá
    oomâs+N+Ess:    omâsin
    oomâs+N+Par:    omâsid
    oomâs+N+Pl+Nom: ommâseh
    oomâs+N+Pl+Gen: ommâsij
    oomâs+N+Pl+Acc: ommâsijd
    oomâs+N+Pl+Ill: ommâsáid
    oomâs+N+Pl+Loc: ommâsijn
    oomâs+N+Pl+Com: ommâsijguin
    oomâs+N+Pl+Abe: ommâsijttáá
   
